Massachusetts, session 194th, H1880.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 94C of the General Laws shall be amended by adding the following
new section:
Section 32O: Illegal Trafficking of Opioids, Heroin, Firearms.
(a) Whoever is found guilty for trafficking substances under section 32E paragraphs (c)
or (c1/2) of this chapter and is concurrently or separately found guilty of any of sections 10E,
10I, 10J, or 10K of Chapter 269 regarding the trafficking or theft of firearms, rifles, shotguns or
machine guns shall be punished by a term of up to life imprisonment in the state prison, that said
sentence may include a fine of not more than $500,000.
SECTION 2. A prosecution commenced under this section shall not be placed on file or
continued without a finding.
of 2

SECTION 3. A person convicted of violating this section shall not be eligible for
furlough, work release, temporary release or receive any deduction from his sentence for good
conduct under sections 129C or 129D of chapter 127.
of 2